public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.aff
SFX A r rié/N ^perkolar
SFX A r rié/N ^perkotar
SFX A r rié/N ^perlustrar
SFX A r rié/N ^permaner
SFX A r rié/N ^permudarar
SFX A r rié/N ^permutar
SFX A r rié/N ^perorar
SFX A r rié/N ^perpetrar
SFX A r rié/N ^perpetuar
SFX A r rié/N ^perseguir
SFX A r rié/N ^perseguitar
SFX A r rié/N ^personaliđar
SFX A r rié/N ^persugar
SFX A r rié/N ^pervertir
SFX A r rié/N ^poder
SFX A r rié/N ^raxar
SFX A r rié/N ^remaner
SFX A r rié/N ^robar
SFX A r rié/N ^roersar
SFX A r rié/N ^sajar
SFX A r rié/N ^scantiđar
SFX A r rié/N ^skortegar
SFX A r rié/N ^sotolinear
SFX A r rié/N ^soverkiar
SFX A r rié/N ^spergoŧar
SFX A r rié/N ^sperimentar
SFX A r rié/N ^sperlongar
SFX A r rié/N ^spernacar
SFX A r rié/N ^sperđurar
SFX A r rié/N ^steriliđar
SFX A r rié/N ^terapienar
SFX A r rié/N ^teraŧar
SFX A r rié/N ^termenar
SFX A r rié/N ^terŧariolar
SFX A r rié/N ^tormentar
SFX A r rié/N ^verdeđar
SFX A r rié/N ^vergiđar
SFX A r rié/N ^verifegar
SFX A r rié/N ^verolar
SFX A r rié/N ^verxurar
SFX A r rié/N ^xberlefar
SFX A r rié/N ^xberlotar
SFX A r rié/N ^xberlumar
SFX A r rié/N ^xberxelar
SFX A r rié/N ^xeguir
SFX A r rié/N ^xermojar
SFX A r rié/N ^xgoñar
SFX A r rié/N ^xlargiđar
SFX A r rié/N ^xmerejar
SFX A r rié/N ^xmeriliar
SFX A r rié/N ^xmerŧiar
SFX A r rié/N ^xmorgolar
SFX A r rié/N ^xnervađar
SFX A r rié/N ^xvergoñaŧar
SFX A r rié/N ^ŧerpir
SFX A r rié/N ^ŧirkuir
SFX A r rié/N ^ŧokir
SFX A r rié/N alar
SFX A r rié/N aler
SFX A r rié/N amar
SFX A r rié/N arar
SFX A r rié/N aver
SFX A r rié/N bertonar
SFX A r rié/N dar
SFX A r rié/N derenar
SFX A r rié/N dir
SFX A r rié/N donar
SFX A r rié/N far
SFX A r rié/N fumar
SFX A r rié/N kalar
SFX A r rié/N kantar
SFX A r rié/N karpir
SFX A r rié/N kolar
SFX A r rié/N korniđar
SFX A r rié/N kurvar
SFX A r rié/N lotar
SFX A r rié/N lumar
SFX A r rié/N menar
SFX A r rié/N meravejar
SFX A r rié/N međar
SFX A r rié/N mojar
SFX A r rié/N mudarar
SFX A r rié/N ojar
SFX A r rié/N okar
SFX A r rié/N parer
SFX A r rié/N perdonar
SFX A r rié/N perletar
SFX A r rié/N pertegar
SFX A r rié/N pongar
SFX A r rié/N rajar
SFX A r rié/N ramar
SFX A r rié/N redar
SFX A r rié/N rigolar
SFX A r rié/N rivar
SFX A r rié/N rokir
SFX A r rié/N rolar
SFX A r rié/N seguir
SFX A r rié/N seguitar
SFX A r rié/N serajar
SFX A r rié/N servir
SFX A r rié/N siar
SFX A r rié/N speronar
SFX A r rié/N sugar
SFX A r rié/N superbir
SFX A r rié/N terminar
SFX A r rié/N teñir
SFX A r rié/N tonar
SFX A r rié/N tuar
SFX A r rié/N vejar
SFX A r rié/N velar
SFX A r rié/N vergoñar
SFX A r rié/N verigolar
SFX A r rié/N versar
SFX A r rié/N vertir
SFX A r rié/N verđelar
SFX A r rié/N veñir
SFX A r rié/N xelar
SFX A r rié/N xmerdar
SFX A r rié/N đurar
SFX A r rié/N ŧercar
SFX A r rié/N ŧernir
SFX A r rié/N ŧitar
SFX A r riéu/O [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A r riéu/O [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A r riéu/O [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A r riéu/O [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A r riéu/O [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A r riéu/O [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A r riéu/O [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A r riéu/O [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A r riéu/O [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A r riéu/O [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A r riéu/O [abfgptu]regar
SFX A r riéu/O [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A r riéu/O [abfkx]renar
SFX A r riéu/O [abfot]raŧar
SFX A r riéu/O [abik]rokar
SFX A r riéu/O [abikoptu]riar
SFX A r riéu/O [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A r riéu/O [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A r riéu/O [adiopt]ronar
SFX A r riéu/O [adklpstuvđŧ]enar
SFX A r riéu/O [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A r riéu/O [aeilnsu]kar
SFX A r riéu/O [aeinosu]tegar
SFX A r riéu/O [aeinu]kir
SFX A r riéu/O [aeio]strar
SFX A r riéu/O [aeiop]letar
SFX A r riéu/O [aeiou]nir
SFX A r riéu/O [aeiou]xenar
SFX A r riéu/O [aeiru]ñar
SFX A r riéu/O [aeiu]bir
SFX A r riéu/O [aeiu]ngar
SFX A r riéu/O [aeiu]ŧiar
SFX A r riéu/O [aelo]var
SFX A r riéu/O [aenoux]golar
SFX A r riéu/O [aeo]liar
SFX A r riéu/O [aeors]tiđar
SFX A r riéu/O [aeou]mentar
SFX A r riéu/O [agot]rejar
SFX A r riéu/O [ai]erar
SFX A r riéu/O [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A r riéu/O [ail]gar
SFX A r riéu/O [ailnou]sar
SFX A r riéu/O [ailnu]bar
SFX A r riéu/O [ailu]minar
SFX A r riéu/O [aiou]rmar
SFX A r riéu/O [aiou]ñir
SFX A r riéu/O [aisu]kiar
SFX A r riéu/O [aku]rifegar
SFX A r riéu/O [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A r riéu/O [als]tar
SFX A r riéu/O [an]deđar
SFX A r riéu/O [an]fraxar
SFX A r riéu/O [an]kuerar
SFX A r riéu/O [an]kuirar
SFX A r riéu/O [ano]fegar
SFX A r riéu/O [anou]pir
SFX A r riéu/O [ao]er
SFX A r riéu/O [ao]niđar
SFX A r riéu/O [ao]rcar
SFX A r riéu/O [ao]rdar
SFX A r riéu/O [ao]rdir
SFX A r riéu/O [ao]rdonar
SFX A r riéu/O [ao]rkar
SFX A r riéu/O [ao]rnar
SFX A r riéu/O [ao]rnir
SFX A r riéu/O [ao]rsar
SFX A r riéu/O [ao]rtir
SFX A r riéu/O [aou]nŧiar
SFX A r riéu/O [aou]rbar
SFX A r riéu/O [aou]rbir
SFX A r riéu/O [aou]rgar
SFX A r riéu/O [aou]rkiar
SFX A r riéu/O [aou]rlar
SFX A r riéu/O [aou]rtar
SFX A r riéu/O [aou]rŧar
SFX A r riéu/O [ar]naliđar
SFX A r riéu/O [aux]nar
SFX A r riéu/O [bcdefgijmnpsvxđŧ]otar
SFX A r riéu/O [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A r riéu/O [bcfgiklnoprtŧ]eđar
SFX A r riéu/O [bcfgjklmnoptuv]aŧar
SFX A r riéu/O [bcfilrtđ]ugar
SFX A r riéu/O [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A r riéu/O [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A r riéu/O [bdfjmnptvx]iar
SFX A r riéu/O [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A r riéu/O [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A r riéu/O [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A r riéu/O [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A r riéu/O [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A r riéu/O [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A r riéu/O [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A r riéu/O [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A r riéu/O [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A r riéu/O [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A r riéu/O [blnrt]uir
SFX A r riéu/O [blprsvx]ear
SFX A r riéu/O [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A r riéu/O [bmtŧ]iliar
SFX A r riéu/O [bou]rogar
SFX A r riéu/O [bp]erlar
SFX A r riéu/O [btv]ergar
SFX A r riéu/O [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A r riéu/O [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A r riéu/O [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A r riéu/O [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A r riéu/O [dg]obar
SFX A r riéu/O [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A r riéu/O [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A r riéu/O [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A r riéu/O [dltv]ernar
SFX A r riéu/O [ds]oler
SFX A r riéu/O [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A r riéu/O [eilox]mar
SFX A r riéu/O [einoru]xar
SFX A r riéu/O [einosu]car
SFX A r riéu/O [eiu]xurar
SFX A r riéu/O [eo]liđar
SFX A r riéu/O [eo]ntiđar
SFX A r riéu/O [es]kotar
SFX A r riéu/O [es]ŧervelar
SFX A r riéu/O [fjkx]ermar
SFX A r riéu/O [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A r riéu/O [fm]eretar
SFX A r riéu/O [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A r riéu/O [fsx]ierir
SFX A r riéu/O [ft]erdir
SFX A r riéu/O [fŧ]etuar
SFX A r riéu/O [gin]ritar
SFX A r riéu/O [iln]trar
SFX A r riéu/O [inru]jar
SFX A r riéu/O [io]ntar
SFX A r riéu/O [io]rkolar
SFX A r riéu/O [ipt]ađar
SFX A r riéu/O [ipu]lar
SFX A r riéu/O [irst]umar
SFX A r riéu/O [klt]ivar
SFX A r riéu/O [kp]avejar
SFX A r riéu/O [kt]erŧar
SFX A r riéu/O [lmtxŧ]enŧiar
SFX A r riéu/O [ln]etrar
SFX A r riéu/O [lnoru]đar
SFX A r riéu/O [mp]eritar
SFX A r riéu/O [mv]ergolar
SFX A r riéu/O [nr]guir
SFX A r riéu/O [ns]erbar
SFX A r riéu/O [ns]ervar
SFX A r riéu/O [ns]kuercar
SFX A r riéu/O [nsv]edar
SFX A r riéu/O [nx]goŧar
SFX A r riéu/O [op]ar
SFX A r riéu/O [ox]longar
SFX A r riéu/O [pt]erveñir
SFX A r riéu/O [pt]resar
SFX A r riéu/O [pt]rotar
SFX A r riéu/O [stŧ]imentar
SFX A r riéu/O [sŧ]erkar
SFX A r riéu/O [tuv]iliđar
SFX A r riéu/O [tv]eriđar
SFX A r riéu/O [tv]erniđar
SFX A r riéu/O [tv]oler
SFX A r riéu/O [xŧ]ertar
SFX A r riéu/O ^alienar
SFX A r riéu/O ^arveñir
SFX A r riéu/O ^bersajar
SFX A r riéu/O ^bordeđar
SFX A r riéu/O ^deramar
SFX A r riéu/O ^derivar
SFX A r riéu/O ^derobar
SFX A r riéu/O ^derokar
SFX A r riéu/O ^derokir
SFX A r riéu/O ^derotar
SFX A r riéu/O ^desavir
SFX A r riéu/O ^desferenŧiar
SFX A r riéu/O ^devorar
SFX A r riéu/O ^devorŧiar
SFX A r riéu/O ^dexeredar
SFX A r riéu/O ^dexverxenar
SFX A r riéu/O ^exerŧitar
SFX A r riéu/O ^fermentar
SFX A r riéu/O ^griliar
SFX A r riéu/O ^guernar
SFX A r riéu/O ^inbaretar
SFX A r riéu/O ^infervorar
SFX A r riéu/O ^inkartonar
SFX A r riéu/O ^intarsiar
SFX A r riéu/O ^interesar
SFX A r riéu/O ^interiŧir
SFX A r riéu/O ^interkalar
SFX A r riéu/O ^interkuerar
SFX A r riéu/O ^interkuirar
SFX A r riéu/O ^interlinear
