public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.dic
abokadar/A
albeđar/A
alŧar/A
andonar/A
apostrofar/A
arguir/A
aséder/A
atribuir/A
dexautorar/A
babar/A
inbagolar/A
baketar/A
inbalokar/A
balotar/A
inbanbolar/A
bañar/A
inbaraŧar/A
inbarkar/A
bastar/A
dexbatiđar/A
dexbaukar/A
xbaveŧar/A
inbekar/A
inbendar/A
xberxelar/A
beverar/A
xbiankeđar/A
bibiatar/A
inbindelar/A
birbantar/A
bixar/A
bójer/A
rebóɉer/A
xbokolar/A
inbolponar/A
abonbar/A
xborar/A
bordeđar/A
dexboskar/A
botonar/A
dexboŧolar/A
bragañar/A
dexbranar/A
inbratar/A
dexbraxolar/A
inbrijar/A
xbroacar/A
xbroɉar/A
inbronbar/A
brunar/A
buelar/A
burlar/A
inbutiliar/A
inbuxerar/A
capar/A
carlar/A
incénder/A
recèñer/A
decéñer/A
cetarar/A
cinconar/A
conbar/A
indir/A
indanar/A
dekiarar/A
dexdeñar/A
déver/A
xdindolar/A
interdíxer/A
dokumentar/A
indomar/A
doperar/A
indopionar/A
indosar/A
radreŧar/A
dedúxer/A
tradúxer/A
đogatolar/A
sođónxer/A
đular/A
edukar/A
emular/A
erpegar/A
estaxiar/A
exeguir/A
dexasuefar/A
sodisfar/A
sfadegar/A
faldeɉar/A
falŧar/A
infangar/A
infasar/A
faŧar/A
anplifegar/A
notifegar/A
speŧifegar/A
sfenir/A
ferir/A
desferenŧiar/A
infestonar/A
enfiar/A
infiankar/A
desfibiar/A
infierir/A
desfikar/A
filoxofar/A
infiokar/A
fiorir/A
fiscar/A
dexafitar/A
sfoderar/A
sfogar/A
foɉar/A
fondamentar/A
forfar/A
sformar/A
fornir/A
fosinar/A
frakasar/A
sfrantumar/A
defraudar/A
sfrexar/A
frixar/A
sfroxar/A
fulminar/A
fuŧilar/A
galiđar/A
ganbinar/A
ingarbujar/A
ingavasar/A
dexgobar/A
xgorgonar/A
ingranar/A
ingrapejar/A
ingravidar/A
grilar/A
xgríxer/A
gruar/A
guarnir/A
xgusar/A
indatejar/A
inkiostrar/A
integrar/A
iritar/A
inɉandolir/A
dexɉonfar/A
skacir/A
kaɉar/A
kalkiđolar/A
skalumar/A
rekanbiar/A
skanpaniđar/A
skapar/A
inkapuŧar/A
inkargar/A
skartar/A
kaskar/A
inkatifar/A
inkaucar/A
inkaxar/A
inkoatar/A
kokolar/A
inkolorar/A
eskomiar/A
konéter/A
konpasar/A
kontiđar/A
kopar/A
traskórer/A
kordonar/A
kortelar/A
kovar/A
skrekolar/A
kroar/A
inkroŧolar/A
inkuartar/A
kuestuar/A
rinkular/A
skurioxar/A
lamentar/A
lapiar/A
laudar/A
relèđer/A
aletar/A
deliberar/A
limegar/A
lodar/A
loŧar/A
stralunar/A
xmacar/A
malar/A
manedar/A
mantekar/A
markar/A
xmarŧir/A
xmaskerar/A
inmaŧetar/A
strameđar/A
amendar/A
inxmerdar/A
kométer/A
emigrar/A
xmirar/A
mokar/A
inmonar/A
mónxer/A
morfir/A
mostrar/A
inmucarar/A
premunir/A
mutolir/A
nàser/A
renegar/A
ninar/A
notar/A
xñanfar/A
oceđar/A
olir/A
onđar/A
ordir/A
abortir/A
oxelar/A
repagar/A
spalar/A
palpuñar/A
konpaneđar/A
parar/A
sparecar/A
skonpartir/A
paskolar/A
inpatar/A
inpaŧientar/A
pekar/A
spelatar/A
propénder/A
inpenolar/A
pèrder/A
perpetuar/A
repèter/A
inpetrir/A
despiantar/A
inpicolar/A
spikolir/A
pipar/A
pistoređar/A
pixolar/A
spolinar/A
pomar/A
pospóner/A
pontar/A
pontolar/A
inportar/A
spostar/A
repoxar/A
presar/A
reprexentar/A
apropiar/A
puniar/A
putaniđar/A
dexradixar/A
raɉar/A
ranpinar/A
rastelar/A
reditar/A
renunŧiar/A
ribelar/A
iriŧolar/A
roegar/A
arolar/A
roñar/A
roveɉar/A
ruimar/A
inruxenir/A
insakar/A
salasar/A
salvar/A
sapunir/A
saxonar/A
secar/A
segar/A
konsèguer/A
deskonseɉar/A
insenetir/A
inseñar/A
serkar/A
sfarŧar/A
rekonsiderar/A
sindikar/A
situar/A
skapolar/A
skarsexar/A
skiantar/A
skortar/A
skríver/A
insoaŧar/A
soletar/A
resomeɉar/A
sorbetar/A
spaleđar/A
ispear/A
inspesar/A
spigaŧar/A
spiumaŧar/A
sprangar/A
malstar/A
stalir/A
staŧar/A
stigar/A
kostituir/A
instokar/A
destranir/A
restrénđer/A
kostruir/A
stubiar/A
strasuar/A
suɉerir/A
insurir/A
stabarar/A
taɉuŧar/A
tamusar/A
taponar/A
tarmar/A
tavanar/A
intelerar/A
sorainténder/A
tenporeɉar/A
inténxer/A
tèñer/A
atéñer/A
desoterar/A
destèser/A
tikiñar/A
tiraniđar/A
retoler/A
tontonar/A
tornir/A
retòrđer/A
detràer/A
trakar/A
strapar/A
retratar/A
destregolar/A
tridar/A
tromentar/A
trotolar/A
desturbar/A
ŧapegar/A
inŧefar/A
ŧercar/A
inŧetar/A
ŧifolar/A
ŧiolar/A
ŧolar/A
udar/A
ustegar/A
vagar/A
vangar/A
revardar/A
desprovéder/A
xveɉar/A
prevénder/A
xventrar/A
skonveñir/A
pervèñer/A
vergar/A
versar/A
verxurar/A
xvetolar/A
invilir/A
inviscar/A
vivakiar/A
invoɉar/A
dexvoltar/A
skonvòlxer/A
inxalontrar/A
xbiasar/A
konxelar/A
rexetar/A
xlankar/A
xñikar/A
xurlar/A
